Connecticut, session 2026, SB00483.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 53a-119 of the general statutes is amended by
adding subdivision (19) as follows (Effective October 1, 2026):
(NEW) (19) Digital defrauding. (A) A person is guilty of digital
defrauding when such person, with intent to cause financial injury to
another person, creates and disseminates a visual representation or
audio recording that such person knows or should have known is a
digitally forged likeness. (B) For purposes of this subdivision, (i)
"disseminate" means to sell, give, provide, lend, trade, mail, deliver,
transfer, publish, distribute, circulate, present, exhibit, advertise or
otherwise offer; and (ii) "Digitally forged likeness" means any
photograph, film, videotape or other visual representation of a person
or an audio recording of a person's voice that (I) is not wholly recorded
by a camera or an audio recorder, or either partially or wholly generated
by a computer system, (II) depicts, and is virtually indistinguishable
from what a reasonable person would believe is the actual depiction of
an identifiable person's image or voice, and (III) is created without the
consent of the person whose image or voice is depicted. (C) In any
prosecution for an offense under this subdivision, it shall be an
affirmative defense that the defendant took reasonable action to place

Substitute Senate Bill No. 483
viewers or listeners of a digitally forged likeness on notice that such
visual representation or audio recording is a digitally forged likeness.
(D) Nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to impose liability on
the provider of an interactive computer service, as defined in 47 USC
230, an information service, as defined in 47 USC 153, or a
telecommunications service, as defined in section 16-247a, for the
creation of content at the request of another person or the dissemination
of content provided by another person, provided such provider did not
know that such content was being created or disseminated in violation
of this subdivision.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Public Act No. 26-119 2 of 2